Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.740

RCW 28B.20.700 through 28B.20.740 as concurrent with other laws.

RCW 28B.20.700 through 28B.20.740 is to be construed as concurrent with other legislation with reference to providing funds for the construction of buildings at the University of Washington, and is not to be construed as limiting any other provision of law with reference thereto.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.740. Prior: 1957 c 254 s 10. Formerly RCW 28.77.580.]